Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1106.01
Deep sedation, defined.

Deep sedation means a drug-induced depression of consciousness during which (1) a patient cannot be easily aroused but responds purposefully following repeated or painful stimulation, (2) the ability to independently maintain ventilatory function may be impaired, (3) a patient may require assistance in maintaining a patent airway and spontaneous ventilation may be inadequate, and (4) cardiovascular function is usually maintained.

Laws 2015, LB80, § 3.